District of Columbia statutes.
42-2202

Establishment of Fund.

(a)

There is established in the District a revolving Senior Citizens’ Home Repair and Improvement Program Fund to be administered by the Mayor for the purpose of providing loans up to $5,000 to lower income senior citizen homeowners to enable them to make repairs and improvements to ensure health and safety in their principal places of residence.

(b)

There may be appropriated out of the revenue of the District an amount necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Mar. 24, 1988, D.C. Law 7-96, § 3, 35 DCR 891
1981 Ed., § 45-3002.
This section is referenced in § 42-2201.